Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GREENFIELD; GREENFIELD ROAD IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $1,392,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Greenfield to design, engineer, construct, and reconstruct Greenfield Road as a paved road from U.S. Highway 55 to County State-Aid Highway 10 (Woodland Trail), and for associated stormwater improvements. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 7, subdivision 9, and does not require a nonstate contribution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in subdivision 1, from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $1,392,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received on the sale of the bonds, must be credited to the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end